Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3928
Chief counsel; qualifications; salary.

The commission shall appoint a chief counsel. The responsibilities and duties of the chief counsel shall be defined by the commission and shall include the overall supervision of the workings of the various divisions of the commission. The chief counsel shall be qualified for his or her position, shall have been licensed to practice law in the State of Nebraska for at least five years prior to the effective date of the appointment, and shall be experienced in the practice of criminal defense, including the defense of capital cases. The chief counsel shall serve at the pleasure of the commission. The salary of the chief counsel shall be set by the commission.

Laws 1995, LB 646, § 10;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 28;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The changes made to section 29-3928 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 28, have been omitted because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.